Hawaii, session 2025, HB1406.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Intergovernmental task force for permit simplification.  (a)  There shall be established within the department of business, economic development, and tourism the intergovernmental task force for permit simplification to identify actions taken, challenges encountered, and legislative measures necessary to facilitate, expedite, and coordinate state and intergovernmental development permit processes. (b)  The membership of the intergovernmental task force for permit simplification shall include representatives of the following bodies, to be designated by the body's head or, in the case of a board or commission, by the chairperson: (1)  The office of the governor; (2)  The department of business, economic development, and tourism; (3)  The commission on water resource management of the department of land and natural resources; (4)  The Hawaii community development authority; (5)  The Hawaii housing finance and development corporation; (6)  The land use commission; (7)  The office of planning and sustainable development; (8)  The public utilities commission; (9)  The small business regulatory review board; (10)  The state historic preservation division of the department of land and natural resources; and (11)  The wastewater branch of the department of health. (c)  The task force shall invite representatives from the following offices to participate in the task force: (1)  Each of the offices of the State's congressional delegation; and (2)  Each of the county planning and permitting departments. (d)  Representatives shall be designated no later than August 1, 2025. (e)  The task force shall hold its first meeting no later than sixty days after the finalization of its members or October 1, 2025, whichever is earlier. (f)  The members of the intergovernmental task force for permit simplification shall serve without compensation for their service on the task force. (g)  The task force shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session during which the task force will continue to exist. (h)  The task force shall cease upon the submission of a final report to the legislature or on June 30, 2027, whichever is earlier. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $ or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the administrative costs of the intergovernmental task force for permit simplification and staff. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of business, economic development, and tourism for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________